Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
State Bond Commission; Notes to Maintain Working Balance in General Fund

§ 31-17-101.
State Bond Commission; members; delegation of powers and duties; adoption of rules.

There is hereby created a commission to be known as as the “State Bond Commission” (hereinafter referred to as the “commission”), which shall consist of the Governor, Attorney General and Treasurer of the State of Mississippi. The Governor shall act as chairman of the commission, the Attorney General shall act as secretary of the commission, and the State Treasurer shall be treasurer of the commission. The successive incumbents in the offices of Governor, Attorney General and State Treasurer shall succeed their predecessors as members of the commission upon assumption of their duties and the completion of their oaths of office. The powers of the commission shall be vested in and exercised by a majority of the members of the commission. The commission may delegate to one or more of its members, or to its officers, agents and employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper, and may adopt rules for the conduct of its business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557 § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-103.
Issuance of notes authorized; terms and conditions.

For the purposes of offsetting any temporary cash flow deficiencies in the General Fund and to maintain a working balance in the General Fund, the commission is authorized at any time and from time to time to borrow money in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed seven and one-half percent (7-1/2%) of the total appropriation made by the State Legislature from the General Fund for the fiscal year in which such deficiency or deficiencies occur, issuing therefor notes as authorized hereunder. Notes may be issued from time to time as the proceeds thereof are needed. The notes shall be authorized by the commission and shall have such terms and details as may be provided by resolution of the commission; provided, however, each resolution of the commission authorizing notes shall:

Describe the need for the proceeds of the notes to be issued; and

Specify the principal amount of the notes or maximum principal amount of the notes which may be outstanding at any one (1) time, the rate or rates of interest or maximum rate of interest or interest rate formula (to be determined in the manner specified in the resolution authorizing the notes) to be incurred through the issuance of such notes, and the maturity date or maximum maturity date of the notes, which maturity date or maximum maturity date shall not extend beyond the last day of the third month following the end of the fiscal year in which the notes were issued.

The commission may also provide in any authorizing resolution for the form of the notes (either fully registered form, bearer form or registered as to principal only form), denominations, place or places of payment (either within or without the State of Mississippi), registration provisions, exchange privileges and manner of execution (including the use of facsimile signatures and a facsimile of the seal of the State of Mississippi). Subject to the limitations contained in this section and the standards and limitations prescribed in the authorizing resolution, the commission, in its discretion, may provide for the notes to be issued and sold, in whole or in part, from time to time, and may delegate to the State Treasurer the power to determine the time or times of sale, the amounts, the maturities, the rate or rates of interest, and such other terms and details of the notes, as may be deemed appropriate by the commission, or the State Treasurer in the event of such delegation. The commission may also provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of notes, in its discretion, but subject to the limitations contained in this section, (a) for the employment of one or more persons or firms to assist the commission in the sale of the notes, (b) for the appointment of one or more banks or trust companies, either within or without the State of Mississippi, as depository for safekeeping, and as agent for the delivery and payment, of the notes, (c) for the refunding of the notes, from time to time, without further action by the commission, unless and until the commission revokes such authority to refund, provided that in no event shall any refunding note be issued with a maturity date later than the last day of the third month following the end of the fiscal year in which the notes to be refunded were issued, (d) for the rating of the notes by one or more nationally recognized rating agencies, and (e) for such other terms and conditions as the commission may deem appropriate. In connection with the issuance and sale of notes as provided in this section, the commission may arrange for lines of credit with any bank, firm or person for the purpose of providing an additional source of repayment for notes issued pursuant to this section. Amounts drawn on such lines of credit may be evidenced by negotiable or nonnegotiable notes or other evidences of indebtedness, containing such terms and conditions as the commission may authorize in the resolution approving the same. The commission is authorized to pay all cost of issuance of the notes, including, without limitation, rating agency fees, printing costs, legal fees, bank or trust company fees, cost to employ persons or firms to assist in the sale of the notes, line of credit fees and charges and all other amounts related to the costs of issuing the notes from amounts available therefor in the General Fund or from the proceeds of the notes, in the discretion of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557 § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 484 § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 1992).

§ 31-17-105.
Purposes and procedures; maintenance of working balance in State General Fund; interfund loans.

The said notes shall be issued for the purpose of maintaining a sufficient working balance in the State General Fund. In effectuating the purposes of Section 31-17-101 et seq., the following procedures shall be followed:

Immediately following the close of business on the last day of every calendar month, the State Fiscal Officer shall submit to each member of the State Bond Commission a certified statement relative to the actual unexpended cash balance remaining to the credit of the State General Fund, and state whether or not, in his opinion, said balance was sufficient, when combined with normal receipts for the ensuing month, to provide enough cash to pay obligations during the month at the time they are due, and if it is not sufficient, stating the amount which will be needed. The State Fiscal Officer shall also submit to the State Bond Commission, if he deems the General Fund cash balance insufficient, a statement showing cash balances in all special funds in the State Treasury which appear to have cash in excess of their immediate needs. The State Bond Commission shall immediately ascertain whether such balances are, in fact, in excess of current needs;

The State Bond Commission shall issue notes as authorized hereunder in whatever amount it finds to be necessary, upon the recommendation of the State Fiscal Officer, to maintain a sufficient working balance in the General Fund; or

If the State Bond Commission determines that it is not practical to issue notes at that time, or if the State Bond Commission determines it is not in the financial interests of the state to issue the notes at that time, and if the cash balance in special funds in the State Treasury in fact have cash in excess of their immediate needs, then the State Bond Commission shall, to the extent that such balances are available, make temporary loans or transfers therefrom to the General Fund. To accomplish such transfer or loan, a requisition shall be issued by the bond commission against the special fund or funds, a copy thereof to be sent to each agency responsible for the administration of the fund or funds so utilized. The State Fiscal Officer shall issue his disbursement warrants against the fund or funds in the manner prescribed in governing statutes, and shall maintain a complete record of such transfers or loans and repayments thereof. A similar but separate record shall be maintained by the State Treasurer’s office, to afford a double check for the benefit of the bond commission and agencies administering any special funds involved. In the event any special fund has such a loan outstanding to the General Fund and needs the use of the money before the balance of the General Fund is sufficient to make repayment thereof, the bond commission is authorized and directed to effectuate a loan or transfer from other special fund or funds to the General Fund in an amount sufficient to make repayment, or if no other special fund balances are available, the bond commission shall immediately issue notes in the amount needed, as authorized in Section 31-17-103.

It shall be the duty of the State Fiscal Officer to advise the bond commission, each month after such notes have been issued or such loans or transfers have been made, whether or not the cash balance to the credit of the State General Fund is sufficient to make full or partial payment of such obligations in addition to other current requirements, and if such is the case, the commission shall promptly issue requisitions on the State General Fund for whatever amount can be paid on such obligations without reducing the General Fund cash balance below the amount needed for current requirements during the remainder of the month; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants accordingly. The State Treasurer shall requisition warrants, as appropriate, from the State Fiscal Officer, for the payment of interest on notes authorized hereunder and the payment of any costs authorized under Section 31-17-103.

The State Bond Commission is also authorized, in the manner provided herein, to make temporary loans or transfers from special funds in the State Treasury to pay amounts authorized under Section 31-17-101 et seq., including without limitation payment of the principal of and interest on notes issued hereunder.

Notes herein authorized to be issued may be reissued, and interfund loans or transfers herein authorized to be made may be remade, provided the total amount of such notes and interfund loans or transfers combined, outstanding at any one (1) time, shall not exceed seven and one-half percent (7-1/2%) of the total appropriations made by the Legislature out of the General Fund for the fiscal year during which such notes are issued and such interfund loans or transfers are made.

The State Bond Commission shall immediately send notice of any action relating to the issuance of bonds or the borrowing of money, under authority of this or any other section, to the Legislative Budget Office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 334, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 194; Laws, 1992, ch. 484, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 1992).

§ 31-17-107.
Full faith and credit of state pledged on notes.

For the prompt payment of said notes at maturity, both principal and interest, the full faith, credit and resources of the State of Mississippi are hereby irrevocably pledged.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557 § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-109.
Sale of notes.

The notes herein authorized shall be sold from time to time by the commission as the needs for the proceeds thereof may arise, which sale shall be made on such terms and in such manner as may be deemed by the commission to be to the best interest of the State of Mississippi, except as herein otherwise provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557 § 5; Laws, 1979, ch. 446, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-111.
Commission to fix terms and details of notes and provide for issuance.

The commission in providing for the issuance of the notes herein authorized shall have full discretion (consistent with the provisions of Section 31-17-103 hereof) in fixing the terms and details thereof, and may provide for the issuance of said notes in such form, executed in such manner and payable at such place or places, and containing such terms, covenants and provisions as said commission may, by resolution or resolutions, provide.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-113.
Use of proceeds limited to purposes provided.

The proceeds of the sale of the notes herein authorized shall be paid into the state treasury and used for the purpose herein provided, and for no other purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557 § 7; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-115.
Issuance of interim certificates in anticipation of notes; supplemental powers conferred in issuance of bonds.

In anticipation of the issuance of the notes herein authorized, the commission may authorize and issue interim certificates payable to bearer or to the purchaser of the notes. Such interim certificates may be in such form and may contain such terms, conditions or provisions and such agreement or agreements relating to their discharge, through the delivery of the notes, as the commission may by resolution or resolutions determine.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557 § 8; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 31-17-117.
Notes and interim certificates to be fully negotiable.

All notes and interim certificates, issued pursuant to the provisions of Sections 31-17-101 through 31-17-123, shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code as said law is now or may hereafter be in force in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557 § 9; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-119.
Taxation of notes, interest and income.

All notes issued hereunder and all interest thereon and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557, § 10; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-121.
State treasurer to keep records of notes issued.

The State Treasurer shall keep a record in his office of the issuance of the notes herein authorized and shall execute a certificate to that effect on the back of each note, which certificate may be signed by either the original or the facsimile signature of the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall also keep proper records relating to the sale and issuance of notes hereunder and the amounts received therefor and paid into the treasury for the purposes herein provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557, § 11; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 31-17-123.
Borrowing authorized to offset temporary cash flow deficiencies; borrowing not to exceed amount which can be repaid in fiscal year of loan.

The intent of the Legislature is to authorize borrowing funds under the provisions of Sections 31-17-101 through 31-17-123 to offset any temporary cash flow deficiencies and should not be construed to authorize the borrowing of any funds in an amount that cannot be repaid during the fiscal year in which the funds are borrowed.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, in the event that the State Fiscal Officer and the State Treasurer make a determination that (i) state-source special funds are not sufficient to cover deficiencies in the General Fund, (ii) the State of Mississippi is unable to repay special fund borrowing within the fiscal year in which it was borrowed, or (iii) state-source funds are insufficient for disaster support and/or assistance purposes due to Hurricanes Katrina and/or Rita; and that the State Bond Commission makes a determination that such deficiency, inability to repay, or insufficiency is the result of a state of emergency within the State of Mississippi, the State Bond Commission is authorized to obtain a line of credit, in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00), from a commercial lender, investment banking group or a consortium of either, or both. The length of indebtedness under this subsection shall not extend past five (5) years following the origination of the line of credit. The line of credit shall be authorized and approved by the State Bond Commission and shall have such terms and details as may be provided by resolution of the State Bond Commission. Loan proceeds shall be received and disbursed by the State Treasurer and deposited into the Disaster Recovery Fund, a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury, and shall be used to cover deficiencies in the General Fund, to repay special fund borrowing and/or to cover any insufficiency in disaster support and/or assistance. Monies remaining in the Disaster Recovery Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, but shall remain in the Disaster Recovery Fund and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the Disaster Recovery Fund shall remain in the fund.

As security for the repayment of the principal and interest on the line of credit provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the full faith, credit and resources of the State of Mississippi are hereby irrevocably pledged.

Upon approval of the State Fiscal Officer, the Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency is authorized to use amounts from the line of credit to match federal funds, and for personnel, call-back wages, base and overtime wages, travel, per diem and other out-of-pocket expenses incurred as a result of Hurricanes Katrina and/or Rita.

This subsection (2) shall be complete authority for the borrowing authorized hereunder and shall not be subject to the limitations provided in the other provisions of this chapter or otherwise under state law.

The State Treasurer shall notify the Legislative Budget Office and the State Department of Finance and Administration of each transfer into and out of the Disaster Recovery Fund on a quarterly basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1966, ch. 557, § 12; Laws, 1979, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 195; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 480, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 21; Laws, 1992, ch. 484 § 10; Laws, 2005, ch. 440, § 2; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 12, § 1; Laws, 2006, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 17; Laws, 2009, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2009).

§ 31-17-125.
Authority to borrow money and funds.

This chapter, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the borrowing of money and funds in the manner and for the purposes authorized hereunder, and none of the restrictions, requirements, conditions or limitations of law applicable to the issuance or sale of notes or other evidences of indebtedness or the making of any arrangements authorized hereunder shall apply and all powers necessary to be exercised in order to carry out the provision of this chapter are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 334, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1982).

§ 31-17-127.
Bonds for cost of Four-Lane Highway Program; Four-Lane Highway Trust Fund.

At any time when the revenue designated under Sections 27-5-101, 27-19-99, 27-19-325, 27-57-37 and 27-65-75 to defray the cost of constructing or reconstructing highways under the Four-Lane Highway Program created under Section 65-3-97 is insufficient to fund the construction priorities as they are scheduled in subsection (3) of Section 65-3-97, the State Bond Commission, upon receipt of a resolution from the Mississippi Transportation Commission requesting the same, is hereby authorized, on the credit of the state, to make temporary borrowings in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed Two Hundred Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00) in order to provide funds in such amounts as may, from time to time, be deemed necessary. In order to provide for, and in connection with such temporary borrowings, the State Bond Commission is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state to enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreement, or agreements, or other agreement or agreements with any banks or trust companies or other lending institutions, investment banking firms or persons in the United States having power to enter into the same, which agreements may contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 27-5-101, 27-19-99, 27-19-325, 27-57-37, 27-65-75 and 65-3-97 as may be authorized by the State Bond Commission.

As an alternative to the issuance of bonds under the provisions of Sections 65-39-5 through 65-39-33, for the purpose of providing funds for infrastructure projects under Section 65-39-1, the State Bond Commission, upon receipt of a resolution from the Mississippi Transportation Commission requesting the same, is hereby authorized, on the credit of the state, to make temporary borrowings in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) in order to provide funds in such amounts as may, from time to time, be deemed necessary. In order to provide for, and in connection with such temporary borrowings, the State Bond Commission is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state to enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreement, or agreements, or other agreement or agreements with any banks or trust companies or other lending institutions, investment banking firms or persons in the United States having power to enter into the same, which agreements may contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of Section 65-39-1 as may be authorized by the State Bond Commission. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Transportation Commission adopt such a resolution or resolutions as often and as frequently as may be necessary to insure the availability of sufficient funds to provide timely completion of all projects authorized under Section 65-39-1.

All temporary borrowings made under this section shall be evidenced by notes of the state which shall be issued, from time to time, for such amounts not exceeding in the aggregate the applicable statutory and constitutional debt limitation, in such form and in such denominations and subject to terms and conditions of sale and issue, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest and time of payment of interest as the State Bond Commission shall authorize and direct and in accordance with Sections 27-5-101, 27-19-99, 27-19-325, 27-57-37, 27-65-75, 65-3-97 and 65-39-1; however, such notes shall mature not more than ten (10) years from the date of issuance. The State Bond Commission may provide for the subsequent issuance of refunding notes or bonds to refund, upon issuance thereof, such notes, and may specify such other terms and conditions with respect to such refunding notes or bonds thereby authorized for issuance as the seller may determine and direct, however such refunding notes or bonds shall mature not more than ten (10) years from date of issuance.

In connection with the issuance of such refunding notes or bonds, the State Bond Commission is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state to enter into agreements with any banks, trust companies, investment banking firms or other institutions or persons in the United States having the power to enter the same:

To purchase or underwrite an issue or series of issues of refunding notes, or bonds.

To enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreements, and to draw monies pursuant to any such agreements on the terms and conditions set forth therein and to issue notes as evidence of borrowings made under any such agreements.

To appoint or act as issuing and paying agent or agents with respect to such refunding notes or bonds.

To do such other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to provide for the payment, when due, of the principal of and interest on such refunding notes or bonds.

Such agreements may provide for the compensation of any purchasers or underwriters of such refunding notes or bonds by payment of a fixed fee or commission at the time of issuance thereof, and for all other costs and expenses, including fees for agreements related to such refunding notes or bonds and paying agent costs. Costs and expenses of issuance may be paid from the proceeds of the refunding notes or bonds.

At or prior to the time of delivery of these refunding notes or bonds, the State Bond Commission shall determine the principal amounts, dates of issue, interest rate or rates, rates of discount, denominations and all other terms and conditions relating to the issuance. The State Treasurer shall perform all acts and things necessary to pay or cause to be paid, when due, all principal of and interest on the notes being refunded by such refunding notes or bonds and to assure that the same may draw upon any monies available for that purpose pursuant to any purchase loan or credit agreements established with respect thereto, all subject to the authorization and direction of the seller.

(i) Such outstanding refunding notes or bonds evidencing such borrowings to defray the cost of constructing or reconstructing highways under the Four-Lane Highway Program established in Section 65-3-97 shall be funded and retired by the revenue designated under Sections 27-5-101, 27-19-99, 27-19-325, 27-57-37 and 27-65-75 and from any and all legally available federal aid grant reimbursements which are hereby pledged for this purpose, which is intended to be a priority use for such pledged funds for so long as any notes, refunding notes or bonds are outstanding. Such revenues shall be deposited into the Four-Lane Highway Trust Fund for the repayment of the debt service of the refunding notes or bonds in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection (5). Such refunding notes or bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be secured by a first and priority lien on the revenues pledged therefor.

Outstanding notes evidencing such borrowings to defray the cost of infrastructure projects under Section 65-39-1 may be funded and retired from monies in the Gaming Counties Bond Sinking Fund created under Section 65-39-3. The refunding notes or bonds must be issued and sold not later than a date two (2) years after the date of issuance of the first notes evidencing such borrowings to the extent that payment of such notes has not otherwise been made or provided for by sources other than proceeds of refunding notes or bonds.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund designated as the “Four-Lane Highway Trust Fund” into which shall be deposited the funds designated in this paragraph until the balance in the fund is equal to the next two (2) debt service requirements of the refunding notes or bonds issued to defray the cost of the Four-Lane Highway Program established in Section 65-3-97. Once the required balance in the fund is reached, deposits shall cease until the amount in the fund falls below the amount equal to the next two (2) debt service requirements of the refunding bonds or notes. Unexpended amounts in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Money in the fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized under this subsection. The State Treasurer shall disburse money from the fund for the purposes authorized under this subsection. Deposits into the fund shall be made as follows:

Federal aid grant reimbursements designated for the Four-Lane Highway Program established in Section 65-3-97 shall be deposited into the Four-Lane Highway Trust Fund until such time as the balance requirements of this section are met.

If the federal aid grant reimbursements designated for the Four-Lane Highway Program are projected by the State Treasurer to be insufficient to meet the balance requirements of this paragraph, then the revenue designated under Sections 27-5-101, 27-19-99, 27-19-325, 27-57-37 and 27-65-75 to defray the cost of the Four-Lane Highway Program shall be deposited into the Four-Lane Highway Trust Fund.

If the amounts required to be deposited by items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (b) are projected by the State Treasurer to be insufficient to meet the balance requirements of this paragraph, then any other legally available federal aid grant reimbursements shall be deposited into the Four-Lane Highway Trust Fund.

At such times as the balance requirements of this paragraph are met, the State Treasurer shall transfer all excess amounts to the State Highway Fund.

Any state laws authorizing the imposition or distribution of taxes, fees or federal reimbursements designated for the Four-Lane Highway Program created under Section 65-3-97, or that affect those taxes, fees and federal reimbursements pledged for the payment of refunding notes or bonds issued under this section, shall not be amended or repealed or otherwise directly or indirectly modified so as to impair such outstanding refunding notes or bonds unless such refunding notes or bonds have been discharged in full or provisions have been made for a full discharge or defeasance.

The proceeds of all such temporary borrowing shall be paid to the Mississippi Transportation Commission to be held and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Sections 27-5-101, 27-19-99, 27-19-325, 27-57-37, 27-65-75, 65-3-97 and 65-39-1.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 322, § 30; Laws 1994, ch. 557, § 39; Laws 1995, ch. 523, § 1; Laws 1997, ch. 562, § 1; Laws 1999, ch. 575, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 1999).